Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1099
School of cosmetology license; school of esthetics license; application; additional information.

Along with the application the applicant for a license to operate a school of cosmetology or school of esthetics shall submit:

(1) A detailed floor plan or blueprint of the proposed school building sufficient to show compliance with the relevant rules and regulations;

(2) Evidence of minimal property damage, personal injury, and liability insurance coverage for the proposed school;

(3) A copy of the curriculum to be taught for all courses;

(4) A copy of the school catalog, handbook, or policies and the student contract; and

(5) A list of the names and credentials of all licensees to be employed by the school.

Laws 1986, LB 318, § 99;

Laws 2002, LB 241, § 36;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-3,138;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 361;

Laws 2018, LB731, § 27.